District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.11

Additional compensation for services of attendants or vocational rehabilitation.

(a)

The Mayor may pay an employee who has been awarded compensation an additional sum of not more than $500 a month, as he or she considers necessary, when he or she finds that the service of an attendant is necessary constantly because the employee is totally blind or has lost the use of both hands or both feet or is paralyzed and unable to walk or because of another disability resulting from the injury making him or her so helpless as to require constant attendance.

(b)

The Mayor may pay an individual undergoing vocational rehabilitation under § 1-623.04 additional compensation necessary for his or her maintenance, but not to exceed $200 a month.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2311, 25 DCR 5740

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-623.12.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-624.11.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.11.